Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.740

Zoning map—Progressive adoption.

Because of practical considerations, the total area of a county to be brought under the control of zoning may be divided into areas possessing geographical, topographical or urban identity and such divisions may be progressively and separately officially mapped.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.740. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 74.]